Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.14
Entity-based exemption, defined.

Entity-based exemption means an exemption based on who purchases the product or who sells the product. An exemption that is available to all individuals shall not be considered an entity-based exemption.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 18;

Laws 2006, LB 887, § 2.